Washington statutes.
RCW 10.118.040

Competitive procurement.

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the office of the attorney general must engage in a competitive procurement to contract with an institution of higher education to implement the statewide use of force data program. The primary purpose of the contract is to develop a system for law enforcement agencies to report, collect, and publish the use of force data reports required in RCW 10.118.030.

(2) The request for proposal or other procurement method should encourage collaboration with other public and private institutions, businesses, and organizations with significant expertise and experience in collecting, tracking, and reporting data on law enforcement interactions with the public.

(3) Members and representatives of entities participating in the advisory group established in section 3, chapter 326, Laws of 2021 may not participate or bid in the competitive procurement.

(4) The advisory group, or designated members of the group, may participate in the procurement process through the development of the request for proposal and the review and evaluation of responsive bidders.

(5) The contract must require the successful bidder to provide appropriate training to its staff and subcontractor staff, including training on racial equity issues.

[ 2021 c 326 s 5.]